Nebraska, session 109, LB105.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 70-604.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
70-604.03 (1) To establish boundary lines of an operating area coincident
with the boundary lines of whole or divided voting precincts voting precinct or
county boundary lines, it shall be permissible to eliminate area from or add
area to the operating area so that retail distribution areas are identified by
reference to either whole or divided whole voting precincts and wholesale
distribution areas are identified by reference to whole counties.
(2) Voting or election precincts may be divided for the purposes of
establishing operating area, chartered territory, and district elections. The
description of such divided precincts may be given by section, township, and
range and shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of State.
(3) Any retail customer whose principal residence is being served by a
public power district and whose principal residence is not in the chartered
territory of such district may request the district in writing at least fifteen
days prior to the certification date for such district, as such date is
provided in section 70-611, for the right for each registered voter residing at
such residence to vote for, and be eligible to hold office as a member of, the
board of directors of such district. The secretary of the district shall cause
notice to be given to each such retail customer which reasonably prescribes the
manner in which the retail customer may request such right to vote. The notice
shall be given by first-class mail and may be included as part of the regular
billing statement mailed to a customer if such billing statement is sent by
first-class mail to such retail customer and the mail is conspicuously marked
as to its importance. Such notice shall be given at least sixty days prior to
the time the election certification and publication information is transmitted
to the Secretary of State pursuant to section 70-611. The district shall
certify to the Secretary of State the names of all such retail customers for
whom such request to vote has been made along with identification of the voting
or election precincts in which such retail customers reside, and each such
retail customer shall be a registered voter and qualified to hold office as a
member of the board of directors, if otherwise qualified to vote.
(4) Any district dividing a precinct pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section or certifying retail customers pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section shall transmit all necessary information relevant to such division or
certification along with the election certification and publication provided
for in section 70-611. All additional election costs caused by such division or
certification shall be due and payable by the district within thirty days after
the receipt of a statement from the county.
Sec. 2. Section 70-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
70-612 (1)(a) Subject to the provisions of Chapter 70, article 6, and
subject to the approval of the Nebraska Power Review Board, the board of
directors of a district, other than a district with a service area containing a
city of the metropolitan class, may amend the petition for its creation to
provide for the division of the territory of such district into two or more
subdivisions for the nomination and election of some or all of the directors.
Each subdivision shall be composed of one or more voting precincts, or divided
voting precincts, and the total population of each such subdivision shall be
approximately the same. Except in districts which contain a city of the
metropolitan class, two or more subdivisions may be combined for election
purposes, and members of the board of directors to be elected from such
combined subdivisions may be nominated and elected at large when not less than
seventy-five percent of the population of the combined subdivisions is within
the corporate limits of any city.
(b) In the event a district formed includes all or part of two or more
counties and is (i) engaged in furnishing electric light and power and more
than fifty percent of its customers are rural customers or (ii) engaged in
furnishing electric light and power and in the business of owning and operating
irrigation works, then and in that event such subdivisions may be formed by
following the boundary lines of whole or divided voting precincts precinct or
county boundary lines without regard to population if in the judgment of the
Nebraska Power Review Board the interests of the rural users of electricity or
of users of irrigation water service in such district will not be prejudiced
-1-

LB105 LB105
2025 2025
thereby.
(2)(a) The board of directors of a district with a service area containing
a city of the metropolitan class may amend its charter to provide for the
division of the territory of the district into election subdivisions composed
of substantially equal population and compact and contiguous territory and
number the subdivisions consecutively and submit the maps to the Nebraska Power
Review Board.
(b) If the board of directors provides for eight election subdivisions
prior to January 1, 2014, the board of directors shall assign each position on
the board of directors to represent a numbered election subdivision for the
remainder of the term of office for which the member is elected, regardless of
whether the member resides in the subdivision, and shall make such assignments
so that the terms of members representing election subdivisions numbered one,
two, and three expire in January 2015, the terms of members representing
election subdivisions numbered four and five expire in January 2017, and the
terms of members representing election subdivisions six, seven, and eight
expire in January 2019. If possible, each member shall be assigned to represent
an election subdivision that corresponds to the end of the term he or she is
serving.
(c) A successor who resides in the numbered election subdivision shall be
nominated and elected at the statewide primary and general elections held in
the calendar year prior to the expiration of the term of the member who
represents such numbered election subdivision.
(3) After each federal decennial census, the board of directors of a
district with a service area containing a city of the metropolitan class shall
create new boundaries for the election subdivisions. In establishing the
boundaries of the election subdivisions, the board of directors shall follow
county lines wherever practicable, shall provide for the subdivisions to be
composed of substantially equal population and compact and contiguous
territory, and shall, as nearly as possible, follow the precinct lines created
by the election commissioner or county clerk after each federal decennial
census.
(4) Any public power district or public power and irrigation district
owning and operating irrigation works may, with approval of the Nebraska Power
Review Board, add representation on its board of directors from any county
which is outside its chartered territory but in which is located some or all of
such irrigation works.
Sec. 3. Original sections 70-604.03 and 70-612, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-